Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB484.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 204 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a clause to read:Section 204. Exclusions from Tax.--The tax imposed by section 202 shall not be imposed upon any of the following:* * *(77) The sale at retail or use of a solar energy system or a component of a solar energy system that complies with applicable national and industry equipment, installation and performance 12345678910111213141516171819202122 standards. The department shall promulgate regulations regarding the specific standards that solar energy systems must meet to qualify for the exclusion under this clause. For purposes of this clause, the term " solar energy system " means the equipment and requisite hardware that provide and are used for collecting, transferring, converting, storing or using incident solar energy for water heating, space heating, cooling or other applications.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0484PN0457 - 2 - 12345678